Utah statutes.
9-7-213.   Rulemaking.

The division may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this chapter including:

(1)  standards which shall be met by libraries to obtain and retain a designation as a depository library;

(2)  the method by which grants are made to individual libraries, but not including appropriations made directly to any other agency or institution;

(3)  standards for the certification of public librarians; and

(4)  standards for the public library online access policy required in Section 9-7-215.



Amended by Chapter 378, 2010 General Session

